District of Columbia statutes.
5-733

Eligibility for benefits under federal law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person entitled to receive any benefit under subchapter I of this chapter on account of death incurred, an injury received, or disease contracted, or an injury or disease aggravated, in the performance of duty shall be entitled, because of the same death, injury, disease, or aggravation, to benefits under subchapter I of Chapter 81 of Title 5, United States Code.

History

Aug. 21, 1957, 71 Stat. 400, Pub. L. 85-157, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-633.
1973 Ed., § 4-538.

References in Text

“Subchapter I of Chapter 81 of Title 5, United States Code” is codified at 5 U.S.C. § 8101 et seq.